North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 12F. Joint Legislative Commission on Seafood and Aquaculture. [Repealed]

§§ 120-70.60 through 120-70.66.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011.

History.

S. 120-70.60; 1989, c. 802, s. 12.1; 2002-165, s. 1.3; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.61; 1989, c. 802, s. 12.1; 1991, c. 689, s. 184.1; 2005-386, s. 6; 2009-484, s. 9; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.62; 1989, c. 802, s. 12.1; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2005-386, s. 1.8; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.63; 1989, c. 802, s. 12.1; 2005-386, s. 1.9; 2006-255, s. 3.2; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.64; 1989, c. 802, s. 12.1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.65; 1989, c. 802, s. 12.1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 8(h); 2007-495, s. 13; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.66; 1989, c. 802, s. 12.1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011.

§§ 120-70.67 through 120-70.69.

Reserved for future codification purposes.